New York, session 2025-2026, A7046.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2590-h of the education law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 57 to read as follows: 3 57. Test preparation for certain students. The chancellor shall estab- 4 lish in cities having a population of one million or more, in conjunc- 5 tion with the appropriate official with jurisdiction over the public 6 school system in such cities, a test preparation program for students in 7 the seventh grade and eighth grade whose test is administered by such 8 cities and who intend to apply to take the specialized high school 9 admissions test. Such test preparation shall be offered free of charge 10 during the regular operating hours of the school day. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 12 the amendments to section 2590-h of the education law made by section 13 one of this act shall not affect the expiration and reversion of such 14 section and shall expire and be deemed repealed therewith. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02171-01-5